West Virginia, session 2025, HB2238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental Protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-11-10 of this code, modified by the Department of Environmental Protection to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 21, 2024, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (water pollution control permit fee schedules, 47 CSR 26), is authorized.